Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 10 Retirement System — Contributions and Benefits

36-10-1.
Member contributions — Deduction from compensation.

Prior to July 1, 2012, each member of the retirement system shall contribute an amount equal to eight and three-quarters percent (8.75%) of his or her compensation as his or her share of the cost of annuities, benefits, and allowances. Effective July 1, 2012, each member of the retirement system shall contribute an amount equal to three and three quarters percent (3.75%) of his or her compensation, except for correctional officers as defined in §

36-10-9.2

who shall contribute an amount equal to eight and three quarters percent (8.75%) of his or her compensation. Effective July 1, 2015, each member of the retirement system, except for correctional officers as defined in §

36-10-9.2

, with twenty (20) or more years of total service as of June 30, 2012 shall contribute an amount equal to eleven percent (11%) of compensation. The contributions shall be made in the form of deductions from compensation.

The deductions provided for herein shall be made notwithstanding that the minimum compensation provided by law for any member shall be reduced thereby. Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided for herein and receipt of his or her full compensation and payment of compensation, less the deductions, shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by the person during the period covered by the payment except as to the benefit provided under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 5; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1950, ch. 2614, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-1

; P.L. 1960, ch. 20, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 289, § 3; P.L. 1978, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 332, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 331, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 509, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 15, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 2.

36-10-1.1.
Department payment of member contributions.

Each department, pursuant to the provisions of § 414(h)(2) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 414(h)(2), shall pick up and pay the contributions that would be payable by the employees as members under §§

36-10-1

,

8-3-16

,

8-8-10.1

,

8-8.2-7

,

28-30-18.1

, and

42-28-22.1

. The contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code; and shall not be included as gross income of the employee until such time as they are distributed. Employee contributions that are picked up pursuant to this section shall be treated and identified as member contributions for all purposes of the retirement system except as specifically provided to the contrary in this section.

Member contributions picked up by a department shall be paid from the same source of funds used for the payment of compensation to a member. A deduction shall be made from a member’s compensation equal to the amount of his or her contributions picked up by his or her departmental employer. This deduction, however, shall not reduce his or her compensation for purposes of computing benefits under the applicable retirement system. Picked up contributions shall be transmitted to the retirement system in accordance with the provisions of §

36-10-1

, on the date contributions are withheld but no later than three (3) business days following the pay period ending in which contributions were withheld.

The state is required to deduct and withhold member contributions and to transmit same to the retirement system and is hereby made liable for the contribution. In addition, any amount of employee contributions actually deducted and withheld shall be deemed to be a special fund in trust for the benefit of the member and shall be transmitted to the retirement system as set forth herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 494, § 12; P.L. 2019, ch. 205, § 6; P.L. 2019, ch. 271, § 6.

36-10-2.
State contributions.

The State of Rhode Island shall make its contribution for the maintenance of the system, including the proper and timely payment of benefits in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapters 8, 16, 28, 31 and 42 of this title, by annually appropriating an amount equal to a percentage of the total compensation paid to the active membership. The percentage shall be computed by the actuary employed by the retirement system and shall be certified by the retirement board to the director of administration on or before the fifteenth day of October in each year. In arriving at the yearly employer contribution the actuary shall determine the value of:

The contributions made by the members;

Income on investments; and

Other income of the system.

The actuary shall thereupon compute the yearly employer contribution that will:

Pay the actuarial estimate of the normal cost for the next succeeding fiscal year; and

Amortize the unfunded liability of the system in accordance with §

36-10-2.1(b)

.

The State of Rhode Island shall remit to the general treasurer the employer’s share of the contribution for state employees, state police, and judges on a payroll frequency basis on the date contributions are withheld but no later than three (3) business days following the pay period ending in which contributions were withheld, and for teachers in a manner pursuant to §

16-16-22

.

In accordance with the intent of §

36-8-20

that the retirement system satisfy the requirements of § 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, the state shall pay to the retirement system:

By June 30, 1995, an amount equal to the sum of the benefits paid to state legislators pursuant to §

36-10-10.1

in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per member (plus accrued interest on such amount at eight percent (8%)) for all fiscal years beginning July 1, 1991, and ending June 30, 1995, but this amount shall be paid only if §

36-10-10.1

(e) becomes effective January 1, 1995; and

By December 31, 1994, twenty million seven hundred eighty eight thousand eight hundred twelve dollars and nineteen cents ($20,788,812.19) plus accrued interest on that amount at eight percent (8%) compounded monthly beginning March 1, 1991, and ending on the date this payment is completed (reduced by amortized amounts already repaid to the retirement system with respect to the amounts withdrawn by the state during the fiscal year July 1, 1990 — June 30, 1991); and

By June 30, 1995, the sum of the amounts paid by the retirement system for retiree health benefits described in §

36-12-4

for all fiscal years beginning July 1, 1989, and ending June 30, 1994, to the extent that the amounts were not paid from the restricted fund described in subsection (c).

Any and all amounts paid to the retirement system under this subsection shall not increase the amount otherwise payable to the system by the state of Rhode Island under subsection (a) for the applicable fiscal year. The actuary shall make such adjustments in the amortization bases and other accounts of the retirement system as he or she deems appropriate to carry out the provisions and intent of this subsection.

In addition to the contributions provided for in subsections (a) through (c) and in order to provide supplemental employer contributions to the retirement system, commencing in fiscal year 2006, and each year thereafter:

Except for fiscal year 2009, fiscal year 2010, and fiscal year 2011, for each fiscal year in which the actuarially determined state contribution rate for state employees, including state contributions under chapter 10.3 of this title, is lower than that for the prior fiscal year, the governor shall include an appropriation to that system equivalent to twenty percent (20%) of the rate reduction for the state’s contribution rate for state employees to be applied to the actuarial accrued liability of the state employees’ retirement system for state employees for each fiscal year;

Except for fiscal year 2009, fiscal year 2010, and fiscal year 2011, for each fiscal year in which the actuarially determined state contribution rate for teachers, including state contributions under chapter 10.3 of this title, is lower than that for the prior fiscal year, the governor shall include an appropriation to that system equivalent to twenty percent (20%) of the rate reduction for the state’s share of the contribution rate for teachers to be applied to the actuarial accrued liability of the state employees’ retirement system for teachers for each fiscal year;

The amounts to be appropriated shall be included in the annual appropriation bill and shall be paid by the general treasurer into the retirement system.

Assessments pursuant to §

42-149-3.1

shall be included in the annual appropriation bill and shall be paid by the general treasurer into the retirement system beginning FY2013.

While the retirement system’s actuary shall not adjust the computation of the annual required contribution for the year in which supplemental contributions are received, the contributions once made may be treated as reducing the actuarial liability remaining for amortization in the next following actuarial valuation to be performed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 5; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-2

; P.L. 1966, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 289, § 3; P.L. 1978, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 174, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 175, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 16, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 87, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 10, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 8; P.L. 2010, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7; P.L. 2019, ch. 205, § 6; P.L. 2019, ch. 271, § 6.

36-10-2.1.
Actuarial cost method.

To determine the employer contribution rate for the State of Rhode Island for fiscal year 2002 and for all fiscal years subsequent, the actuary shall compute the costs under chapter 10 of title 36 using the entry age normal cost method.

The determination of the employer contribution rate for fiscal year 2013 shall include a reamortization of the current Unfunded Actuarial Accrued Liability (UAAL) over a closed twenty-five (25) year period. After an initial period of five (5) years, future actuarial gains and losses occurring within a plan year will be amortized over individual new twenty (20) year closed periods.

The determination of the employer contribution rate commencing with fiscal year 2017 shall include a re-amortization of the current unfunded actuarial accrued liability (UAAL) attributable to the sixty percent (60%) of contribution responsibility not partitioned to the state in §

16-16-22

over a closed twenty-five (25) year period. This will be accomplished by dividing the UAAL as of June 30, 2014 into two (2) separate amortization periods. Future actuarial gains and losses occurring within a plan year will be amortized over individual new twenty (20) year closed periods and allocated in the forty percent (40%) state / sixty percent (60%) municipal proportion set forth in §

16-16-22

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 201, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 3.

36-10-3.
Credits to individuals in annuity savings account.

All contributions made by members and interest thereon to July 1, 1947, shall be credited to the individual members’ accounts in the annuity savings account. Effective July 1, 1947, the amount of accumulated contributions in the accounts of the members of the system which have been credited to the annuity savings fund shall be transferred to the annuity savings account and maintained in that account to the credit of the individual members. Effective July 1, 1965, the accumulated contributions of any inactive member who has been separated from service for five (5) years or more whose total service is less than ten (10) years shall be transferred from the annuity savings account to the contingent reserve for state employees or teacher members as the case may be. These funds will be held in escrow and should any member reenter service and again become a member, his or her previous contributions shall be revived and reinstated to his or her account for all purposes of this system. A member will still be eligible for a refund of these contributions upon application by him or her or his or her heirs at any time. Member contributions made pursuant to §

36-10-1.1

or

16-16-22.1

pursuant to a plan for the employer pick up of employee contributions shall be credited to a separate fund within an individual member’s account in the annuity savings account so that the amounts contributed prior to the effective date for the pick up of employee contributions may be distinguished from the amounts contributed on or after the date of which the governmental employer begins to pick up the employee contributions required by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 5; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2377, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-3

; P.L. 1965, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 137, § 2.

36-10-4.
Credits and charges to contingent reserve account.

The amounts credited by the system to the annuity reserve fund and pension accumulation fund prior to July 1, 1947, shall be transferred on that date to a contingent reserve account. All appropriations by the state and all other income of the system except member contributions shall be credited to the contingent reserve account. The annuity savings account of any member of the system who shall be granted an annuity, benefit, or retirement allowance under the provisions of this chapter shall be transferred to the contingent reserve account, and all payments on account of any annuity, benefit, or retirement allowance shall be charged thereto. Any excess remaining in the contingent reserve account at the end of any fiscal year after payments for the year shall have been charged to the account shall be considered as a contingent reserve to meet the future liabilities of the system.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 5; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-4

.

36-10-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 5; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2377, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-5

; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 170, § 2.

36-10-6.
Agreements for federal contributions.

The retirement board shall have the authority to enter into agreements with the federal government or appropriate agencies thereof respecting grants, contributions, or reimbursements to be made by the federal government as an equitable share in the cost of providing the annuities, benefits, and retirement allowances for those members of the system whose compensation is paid, in whole or in part, by the federal government or for whose compensation the state receives reimbursement, in whole or in part, from the federal government.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 5; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-6

.

36-10-7.
Guaranty by state — Annual appropriations.

The general assembly of the state of Rhode Island hereby declares that it is the intention of the state to make payment of the annuities, benefits, and retirement allowances provided for under the provisions of this chapter and to that end that it is the intention of the state to make the appropriations required by the state to meet its obligations to the extent provided in this chapter. The general assembly shall make annual appropriations which shall be sufficient to provide for the payment of the annuities, benefits, and retirement allowances required of the state under this chapter. The amounts to be appropriated shall be included in the annual appropriation bill and shall be paid by the general treasurer into the retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 6; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-7

.

36-10-8.
Refund of contributions — Repayment and restoration of credits.

A member who withdraws from service or ceases to be a member for any reason other than death or retirement shall be paid on demand a refund consisting of the accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in his or her individual account, without interest. Any member receiving a refund shall thereby forfeit and relinquish all accrued rights as a member of the system together with credits for total service previously granted to the member; provided, however, that if any member who has received a refund shall subsequently reenter the service and again become a member of the system, he or she shall have the privilege of restoring all money previously received or disbursed to his or her credit as a refund of contributions, plus regular interest for the period from the date of refund to the date of the restoration. Upon the repayment of such refund including accrued interest as herein provided, the member shall again receive credit for the amount of total service which he or she had previously forfeited by the acceptance of the refund. The restoration of that credit shall be permitted only after the member shall have rendered at least one year of continuous service following his or her latest reentry into service for which he or she shall have made contributions to this system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, §§ 9, 10; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-8

; P.L. 1976, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7.

36-10-9.
Retirement on service allowance — In general.

Retirement of a member on a service retirement allowance shall be made by the retirement board as follows:

Any member may retire upon his or her written application to the retirement board as of the first day of the calendar month in which the application was filed; provided, the member was separated from service prior thereto; and further provided, however, that if separation from service occurs during the month in which application is filed, the effective date shall be the first day following that separation from service; and provided further that the member on his or her retirement date attained the age of sixty (60) and completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, or who, regardless of age, has completed twenty-eight (28) years of total service and has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, and who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.

For members who become eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, and prior to July 1, 2012, benefits are available to members who have attained the age of sixty-two (62) and completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service. For members in service as of October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, but become eligible to retire prior to July 1, 2012, the minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62) will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of September 30, 2009. The proportional formula shall work as follows:

The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in effect on September 30, 2009, which shall then be subtracted from the minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62).

The formula shall then take the member’s total service credit as of September 30, 2009, as the numerator and the years of service credit determined under (1) as the denominator.

The fraction determined in (2) shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined in (1) to apply a reduction in years from age sixty-two (62).

Any member, who has not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, may retire upon his or her written application to the retirement board as of the first day of the calendar month in which the application was filed; provided, the member was separated from service prior thereto; and further provided, however, that if separation from service occurs during the month in which application is filed, the effective date shall be the first day following that separation from service; provided, the member or his or her retirement date had attained the age of fifty-nine (59) and had completed at least twenty-nine (29) years of total service or provided that the member on his or her retirement date had attained the age of sixty-five (65) and had completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service; or provided, that the member on his or her retirement date had attained the age of fifty-five (55) and had completed twenty (20) years of total service provided, that the retirement allowance, as determined according to the formula in §

36-10-10

is reduced actuarially for each month that the age of the member is less than sixty-five (65) years, and who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.

For members who become eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009 and prior to July 1, 2012, benefits are available to members who have attained the age of sixty-two (62) and completed at least twenty-nine (29) years of total service or have attained the age of sixty-five (65) and completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service. For members in service as of October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, but become eligible to retire prior to July 1, 2012, who have a minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62), the retirement age will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of September 30, 2009. The proportional formula shall work as follows:

The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in effect on September 30, 2009, which shall then be subtracted from the minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62).

The formula shall then take the member’s total service credit as of September 30, 2009, as the numerator and the years of service credit determined under (1) as the denominator.

The fraction determined in (2) above shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined in (1) to apply a reduction in years from age sixty-two (62).

Effective July 1, 2012, the following shall apply to all members not eligible to retire prior to July 1, 2012:

A member with contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, shall be eligible to retire upon the completion of at least five (5) years of contributory service and attainment of the member’s Social Security retirement age.

For members with five (5) or more years of contributory service as of June 30, 2012, with contributory service on and after July 1, 2012, who have a retirement age of Social Security Retirement Age, the retirement age will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of June 30, 2012, but in no event shall a member’s retirement age under this subparagraph (ii) be prior to the attainment of age fifty-nine (59) or prior to the member’s retirement age determined under the laws in effect on June 30, 2012. The proportional formula shall work as follows:

The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in effect on June 30, 2012, which shall then be subtracted from Social Security retirement age;

The formula shall then take the member’s total service credit as of June 30, 2012, as the numerator and the projected service at retirement age in effect on June 30, 2012, as the denominator;

The fraction determined in (2) shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined in (1) to apply a reduction in years from Social Security retirement age.

Effective July 1, 2015, a member who has completed twenty (20) or more years of total service and who has attained an age within five (5) years of the eligible retirement age under subparagraphs (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above or subsection (d) below, may elect to retire provided that the retirement allowance shall be reduced actuarially for each month that the age of the member is less than the eligible retirement age under subparagraphs (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above or subsection (d) below in accordance with the following table:

Notwithstanding any other provisions of section 36-10-9(c), a member who has completed ten (10) or more years of contributory service as of June 30, 2012, may elect to retire at his or her eligible retirement date as determined under paragraphs (1)(a) and (1)(b) above provided that a member making an election under this paragraph shall receive the member’s retirement benefit determined and calculated based on the member’s service and average compensation as of June 30, 2012. This provision shall be interpreted and administered in a manner to protect a member’s accrued benefit on June 30, 2012.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of subsection (c) above, effective July 1, 2015, members in active service shall be eligible to retire upon the earlier of: (A) The attainment of at least age sixty-five (65) and the completion of at least thirty (30) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-four (64) and the completion of at least thirty-one (31) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-three (63) and the completion of at least thirty-two (32) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-two (62) and the completion of at least thirty-three (33) years of total service; or (B) The member’s retirement eligibility date under subsections (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above.

Any faculty employee at a public institution of higher education under the jurisdiction of the council on postsecondary education shall not be involuntarily retired upon attaining the age of seventy (70) years.

Except as specifically provided in §

36-10-9.1

, §§

36-10-12

—

36-10-15

, and §§

45-21-19

—

45-21-22

, (I) On or prior to June 30, 2012 no member shall be eligible for pension benefits under this chapter unless the member shall have been a contributing member of the employee’s retirement system for at least ten (10) years, or (II) For members in active contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, the member shall have been a contributing member of the retirement system for at least five (5) years.

Provided, however, a person who has ten (10) years service credit on or before June 16, 1991, shall be vested.

Furthermore, any past service credits purchased in accordance with §

36-9-38

shall be counted towards vesting.

Any person who becomes a member of the employees’ retirement system pursuant to §

45-21-4

shall be considered a contributing member for the purpose of chapter 21 of title 45 and this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no more than five (5) years of service credit may be purchased by a member of the system. The five (5) year limit shall not apply to any purchases made prior to January 1, 1995. A member who has purchased more than five (5) years of service credits before January 1, 1995, shall be permitted to apply those purchases towards the member’s service retirement. However, no further purchase will be permitted. Repayment in accordance with applicable law and regulation of any contribution previously withdrawn from the system shall not be deemed a purchase of service credit.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, effective July 1, 2012, except for purchases under §§

16-16-7.1

,

36-5-3

,

36-9-31

,

36-10-10.4

, and

45-21-53

, (A) For service purchases for time periods prior to a member’s initial date of hire, the purchase must be made within three (3) years of the member’s initial date of hire, (B) For service purchases for time periods for official periods of leave as authorized by law, the purchase must be made within three (3) years of the time the official leave was concluded by the member. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, service purchases from time periods prior to June 30, 2012, may be made on or prior to June 30, 2015.

No member of the employees’ retirement system shall be permitted to purchase service credits for casual, seasonal, or temporary employment, or emergency appointment, for employment as a page in the general assembly, or for employment at any state college or university while the employee is a student or graduate assistant of the college or university.

Except as specifically provided in §§

16-16-6.2

and

16-16-6.4

, a member shall not receive service credit in this retirement system for any year or portion of it, which counts as service credit in any other retirement system in which the member is vested or from which the member is receiving a pension and/or any annual payment for life. This subsection shall not apply to any payments received pursuant to the federal Social Security Act or to payments from a military pension earned prior to participation in state or municipal employment, or to military service credits earned prior to participation in state or municipal employment.

A member who seeks to purchase or receive service credit in this retirement system shall have the affirmative duty to disclose to the retirement board whether or not he or she is a vested member in any other retirement system and/or is receiving a pension, retirement allowance, or any annual payment for life. The retirement board shall have the right to investigate as to whether or not the member has utilized the same time of service for credit in any other retirement system. The member has an affirmative duty to cooperate with the retirement board including, by way of illustration and not by way of limitations the duty to furnish or have furnished to the retirement board any relevant information which is protected by any privacy act.

A member who fails to cooperate with the retirement board shall not have the time of service counted toward total service credit until such time as the member cooperates with the retirement board and until such time as the retirement board determines the validity of the service credit.

A member who knowingly makes a false statement to the retirement board regarding service time or credit shall not be entitled to a retirement allowance and is entitled only to the return of his or her contributions without interest.

Year Preceding Cumulative Annual Cumulative Monthly Retirement Reduction Reduction For Year 1 9% .75% For Year 2 8% .667% For Year 3 7% .583% For Year 4 7% .583% For Year 5 7% .583%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 9; P.L. 1942, ch. 1256, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 7; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 4; P.L. 1953, ch. 3201, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-10-9

; P.L. 1960, ch. 20, § 2; P.L. 1962, ch. 143, § 2; P.L. 1966, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 2, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 56, § 1; 1971, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 42, § 1; 1973, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 211, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 331, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 520, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 55, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 7; P.L. 1994, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 4.

Division of Marital Property.

The family court cannot distribute a teacher/state pension to the nonemployee/nonmember spouse before the employee/member spouse separates from service; however, it can award to the nonparticipating spouse the value of the benefits in one of the several possible ways available to it generally for the distribution of marital assets. Furia v. Furia, 638 A.2d 548,

1994 R.I. LEXIS 80

(R.I. 1994).

36-10-9.1.
Retirement on service allowance — Legislators.

Every person who shall have served as a member of the senate or of the house of representatives, or in combination of both the senate and the house of representatives, and/or other employment as defined in §

36-9-20

, and/or including up to four (4) years of military service as defined in §

36-9-31

, for a period in the aggregate of eight (8) years, and having attained the age of fifty-five (55) years shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance, as in §

36-10-10.1

upon application therefor to the retirement board; provided, however, that any person who shall have served as a member of the senate or of the house of representatives, or in combination of both the senate and the house of representatives, and/or other employment as defined in §

36-9-20

, and/or including up to four (4) years of military service as defined in §

36-9-31

, for a period in the aggregate of twenty (20) years or more shall be entitled to receive a retirement allowance as in §

36-10-10.1

regardless of his or her age upon completion of the twenty (20) years; provided further, however, that if any person who shall have served as a member of the senate or the house of representatives, or in combination of both the senate or the house of representatives, and/or other employment as defined in § 36-9-20, for a period in the aggregate of eight (8) years dies leaving a surviving spouse or domestic partner, the benefit as provided by § 36-10-10.1 shall be payable to his or her spouse or domestic partner to be continued for his or her lifetime or remarriage or establishment of a domestic partnership.

No legislator shall be eligible for benefits under this section unless the legislator shall have served a minimum of four (4) years as a member of the senate or the house of representatives or in combination of both the senate and the house of representatives.

Except as hereinafter provided, any legislator, elected at the general election in 1988 or thereafter to serve as a member of the general assembly shall not be eligible for benefits under subsection (a) of this section unless the legislator shall have served a minimum of eight (8) years as a member of the senate or the house of representatives or in combination of both the senate and the house of representatives; provided however, that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any legislator who was elected to serve as a member of the general assembly prior to the general election of 1988.

Service credits earned prior to January 5, 1993, by a person as a member of the senate or of the house of representatives or in combination of both the senate and the house of representatives may be utilized by that person for any retirement purpose permitted under current law.

Service credits earned on or after January 5, 1993, by a person as a member of the senate or of the house of representatives or in combination of both the senate and the house of representatives may be utilized by that person only for the purposes of §

36-10-10.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 211, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 550, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 7; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 11.